Utah statutes.
7-1-208.2.   Deputy commissioner.

The commissioner may appoint a deputy commissioner who shall be a citizen of the United States and a member of the Utah State Bar, to serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The deputy commissioner shall serve as staff attorney for the department and perform all other duties assigned to him by the commissioner.



Enacted by Chapter 267, 1989 General Session

